zh-TW: 樂器材質: 非洲黑木; 榿木; 鋁; 白蠟木; 椴木; 山毛櫸木; 樺木材; 黃銅; 巴西木; 銅色; 碳纖維; 陶瓷; 可可波羅木; 紅銅色; 烏木; 玻璃纖維; 金色; 鍍金; 硬質橡膠; 紅褐色; 楓木; 金屬; 鎳; 鎳銀; 鍍鎳; 尼龍; 橡木材; 蘇木; 塑膠; 玫瑰木; 橡膠; 矽膠; 銀色; 鍍銀; 杉木; 不銹鋼; 鋼; 合成; 木材; 其他
el: Υλικό οργάνου: Αφρικανικό μαύρο ξύλο; Σκλήθρα; Αλουμίνιο; Ξύλο φλαμουριάς; Φυλίρα; Ξύλο οξυάς; Ξύλο σημύδας; Ορείχαλκος; Ξυλεία Βραζιλίας; Ορείχαλκος; Ανθρακόνημα; Κεραμικό; Cocobolo; Χαλκός; Έβενος; Υαλοβάμβακας; Χρυσό; Επίχρυσο; Σκληρό καουτσούκ; Μαόνι; Ξύλο σφενδάμου; Μέταλλο; Νικέλιο; Επινικελωμένο ασήμι; Επινικελωμένο; Νάιλον; Ξύλο βελανιδιάς; Περναμπούκο; Πλαστικό; Ροδόξυλο; Καουτσούκ; Σιλικόνη; Ασήμι; Επάργυρο; Ξύλο ελάτης; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Χάλυβας; Συνθετικό; Ξύλο; Άλλο
sv: Instrument - material: Afrikansk blackwood; Alträ; Aluminium; Askträ; Svartlind; Bokträ; Björkträ; Mässing; Bresilja; Brons; Kolfiber; Keramisk; Cocobolo; Koppar; Ebenholts trä; Glasfiber; Gyllene; Guldpläterad; Hårt gummi; Mahogny; Lönnträ; Metall; Nickel; Nysilver; Nickelpläterad; Nylon; Ekträ; Pernambuco; Plast; Rosenträ; Gummi; Silikon; Silver; Silverpläterad; Granträ; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Syntetisk; Trä; Annat
hu: Hangszer anyaga: Afrikai feketefa; Égerfa; Alumínium; Kőrisfa; Hársfa; Bükkfa; Nyírfa; Sárgaréz; Brazilfa; Bronz; Szénszál; Kerámia; Cocobolo; Réz; Ébenfa; Üveggyapot; Arany; Aranyozott; Kemény gumi; Mahagóni; Juharfa; Fém; Nikkel; Nikkelezüst; Nikkelezett; Nejlon; Tölgyfa; Pernambuco; Műanyag; Rózsafa; Gumi; Szilikon; Ezüst; Ezüstözött; Lucfenyő; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Szintetikus; Fa; Egyéb
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำเครื่องดนตรี: ไม้แอฟริกันแบล็กวูด; ไม้แอลเดอร์; อะลูมิเนียม; ไม้แอชวูด; ไม้เบสวูด; ไม้บีช; ไม้เบิร์ช; ทองเหลือง; ไม้บราซิลวูด; สีบรอนซ์; เส้นใยคาร์บอน; เซรามิก; ไม้โคโคโบโล; สีทองแดง; ไม้อีโบนี่; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; โกลด์; ชุบทอง; ยางแข็ง; ไม้มะฮอกกานี; ไม้เมเปิล; โลหะ; นิกเกิล; เงินนิกเกิล; ชุบนิกเกิล; ไนลอน; ไม้โอ๊ค; เปร์นัมบูโก; พลาสติก; สีโรสวู้ด; ยาง; ซิลิโคน; ซิลเวอร์; ชุบเงิน; ไม้สปรูซ; เหล็กสเตนเลส; เหล็ก; สังเคราะห์; ไม้; อื่นๆ
es: Material del instrumento: Madera negra africana; Madera de aliso; Aluminio; Madera de fresno; Tilo; Madera de haya; Madera de abedul; Latón; Madera de Brasil; Bronce; Fibra de carbono; Cerámica; Cocobolo; Cobre; Madera de ébano; Fibra de vidrio; Dorado; Chapado en oro; Goma dura; Caoba; Madera de arce; Metal; Níquel; Níquel-plata; Niquelado; Nylon; Madera de roble; Pernambuco; Plástico; Palisandro; Goma; Silicona; Plateado; Plateado; Madera de abeto; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Sintético; Madera; Otros
ja: 機器の材質: アフリカンブラックウッド; アルダー材; アルミニウム; アッシュウッド; バスウッド; ブナ材; バーチ材; 真鍮; ブラジルウッド; ブロンズ; カーボンファイバー; セラミック; ココボロ; コッパー; エボニー材; ガラス繊維; ゴールド; 金メッキ; 硬質ゴム; マホガニー; メープルウッド; 金属; ニッケル; ニッケル銀; ニッケルメッキ; ナイロン; オーク材; ペルナンブコ; プラスチック; ローズウッド; ゴム; シリコーン; シルバー; 銀メッキ; スプルース材; ステンレススチール; スチール; 合成品; 木材; その他
pl: Materiał instrumentu: Dalbergia czarnodrzew; Drewno olszowe; Aluminium; Drewno jesionowe; Lipa; Drewno bukowe; Drewno brzozowe; Mosiądz; Brezylka ciernista; Brąz; Włókno węglowe; Ceramika; Cocobolo; Miedź; Drewno hebanowe; Włókno szklane; Złota; Pozłacany; Twarda guma; Mahoń; Drewno klonowe; Metal; Nikiel; Nikiel srebro; Niklowany; Nylon; Drewno dębowe; Pernambuco; Tworzywo sztuczne; Palisander; Guma; Silikon; Srebrna; Posrebrzany; Drewno świerkowe; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Syntetyczne; Drewno; Pozostałe
sl-SI: Material glasbila: Afriški črni les; Jelšev les; Aluminij; Jesenov les; Ameriška lipa; Bukov les; Brezov les; Medenina; Brazilski les; Bron; Ogljikova vlakna; Keramika; Cocobolo; Baker; Ebenovinast les; Steklena vlakna; Zlato; Pozlačeno; Trda guma; Mahagonij; Javorjev les; Kovina; Nikelj; Nikelj srebro; Ponikljana; Najlon; Hrastov les; Pernambuco; Plastika; Palisander; Guma; Silikon; Srebro; Posrebrena; Smrekov les; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Sintetika; Les; Drugo
bg-BG: Материал на инструмента: Африканско черно дърво; Дървесина от елша; Алуминий; Ясенова дървесина; Липа; Букова дървесина; Брезова дървесина; Месинг; Бразилско дърво; Бронз; Въглеродни влакна; Керамика; Кокоболо; Мед; Абаносово дърво; Fiberglass; Злато; Позлатено покритие; Твърда гума; Махагон; Кленова дървесина; Метал; Никел; Никелово сребро; Никелирано покритие; Найлон; Дъбова дървесина; Пернамбуко; Пластмаса; Палисандрово дърво; Каучук; Силикон; Сребро; Посребрено покритие; Смърчова дървeсина; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Синтетичен; Дърво; Други
ko: 악기 재료: 아프리카 블랙우드; 오리나무; 알루미늄; 물푸레나무; 참피나무; 너도밤나무; 자작나무; 황동; 브라질우드; 청동색; 탄소 섬유; 세라믹; 코코볼로; 구리; 흑단 나무; 유리 섬유; 금색; 금 도금; 단단한 고무; 마호가니; 단풍나무; 금속; 니켈; 니켈 실버; 니켈 도금; 나일론; 참나무; 페르남부쿠; 플라스틱; 로즈우드; 고무; 실리콘; 은색; 은 도금; 가문비나무; 스테인리스 스틸; 강철; 인조; 목재; 기타
cs: Materiál nástroje: Africké černé dřevo; Olšové dřevo; Hliník; Jasanové dřevo; Lipové dřevo; Bukové dřevo; Březové dřevo; Mosaz; Dřevo brazilwood; Bronzová; Uhlíkové vlákno; Keramika; Cocobolo; Měděná; Ebenové dřevo; Skelná vata; Zlatá; Pozlacené; Tvrdá guma; Mahagon; Javorové dřevo; Kov; Nikl; Niklové stříbro; Poniklované; Nylon; Dubové dřevo; Pernambuco; Plast; Palisandr; Guma; Silikon; Stříbrná; Postříbřený; Smrkové dřevo; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Syntetické; Dřevo; Jiné
zh-CN: 乐器材质: 非洲黑木; 赤杨木; 铝; 白蜡木; 椴木; 山毛榉木; 桦木; 黄铜; 巴西木; 青铜色; 碳纤维; 陶瓷制品; 黄檀; 铜色; 黑檀木; 玻璃纤维; 金色; 镀金; 硬橡胶; 茶褐色; 苹果木; 金属; 镍; 镍银; 镀镍; 尼龙; 橡木材; 伯南布哥; 塑料; 深红色; 橡胶; 硅胶; 银色; 镀银; 云杉木; 不锈钢; 钢; 合成; 木头; 其他
pt-PT: Material do instrumento: Mpingo; Alnus; Alumínio; Madeira de freixo; Tília americana; Madeira de faia; Madeira de bétula; Latão; Pau-brasil; Bronze; Fibra de carbono; Cerâmica; Cocobolo; Cobre; Madeira de ébano; Fibra de vidro; Ouro; Banhado a ouro; Borracha rígida; Mogno; Madeira de ácer; Metal; Níquel; Prata níquel; Banhado a níquel; Náilon; Madeira de carvalho; Pernambuco; Plástico; Rosa acastanhado; Borracha; Silicone; Prata; Banhado a prata; Madeira de abeto; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Sintético; Madeira; Outro
lt-LT: Instrumento medžiaga: Senegalinė dalbergija; Alksnio mediena; Aliuminis; Uosio mediena; Amerikinė liepa; Buko mediena; Beržo mediena; Žalvaris; Dygliuotoji cezalpinija; Bronza; Anglies pluoštas; Keramika; Cocobolo; Varis; Juodmedis; Stiklo pluoštas; Auksas; Paauksuotas; Kieta guma; Raudonmedis; Klevo mediena; Metalas; Nikelis; Naujasidabris; Nikeliuotas; Nailonas; Ąžuolo mediena; Pernambukas; Plastikas; Rosewood; Kaučiukas; Silikonas; Sidabrinė; Pasidabruotas; Eglės mediena; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Plienas; Sintetika; Mediena; Kita
nl: Materiaal instrument: African blackwood; Elzenhout; Aluminium; Essenhout; Lindehout; Beukenhout; Berkenhout; Messing; Brazielhout; Brons; Koolstofvezel; Keramiek; Cocobolo; Koper; Ebbenhout; Glasvezel; Gold; Verguld; Hard rubber; Mahonie; Esdoornhout; Metaal; Nikkel; Nikkelzilver; Vernikkeld; Nylon; Eikenhout; Pernambuco; Plastic; Palissander; Rubber; Siliconen; Silver; Verzilverd; Vurenhout; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Synthetisch; Hout; Andere
tr: Enstrüman malzemesi: Afrika karaağacı; Kızılağaç ağacı; Alüminyum; Dişbudak kerestesi; Ihlamur ağacı; Kayın ağacı; Huş ağacı; Pirinç; Kızılağaç; Bronz; Karbon fiber; Seramik; Cocobolo; Bakır; Abanoz ağacı; Fiberglas; Gold; Altın kaplama; Sert kauçuk; Maun; Akçaağaç odunu; Metal; Nikel; Nikel gümüş; Nikel kaplama; Plastik; Meşe ağacı; Pernambuco; Plastik; Gül ağacı; Kauçuk; Silikon; Silver; Gümüş kaplama; Ladin ağacı; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Sentetik; Ahşap; Diğer
ro-RO: Material instrument: Dalbergia melanoxylon; Lemn de arin; Aluminiu; Lemn de frasin; Lemn de tei; Lemn de fag; Lemn de mesteacăn; Alamă; Fernambuc; Bronz; Fibră de carbon; Ceramică; Cocobolo; Cupru; Lemn de abanos; Fibră de sticlă; Aur; Placat cu aur; Cauciuc dur; Mahon; Lemn de arțar; Metal; Nichel; Nichel-argint; Placat cu nichel; Nailon; Lemn de stejar; Pernambuco; Plastic; Lemn de trandafir; Cauciuc; Silicon; Argint; Placat cu argint; Lemn de molid; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Sintetic; Lemn; Altele
nb: Instrumentmateriale: Afrikansk svartved; Eltre; Aluminium; Asketre; Lindetre; Bøktre; Bjørketre; Messing; Brasiltre; Bronse; Karbonfiber; Keramikk; Cocobolo; Kobber; Ibenholttre; Glassfiber; Gull; Gullbelagt; Hard gummi; Mahogni; Lønnetre; Metall; Nikkel; Nikkelsølv; Forniklet; Nylon; Eiketre; Pernambuco; Plast; Palisander; Gummi; Silikon; Sølv; Sølvforgylt; Grantre; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Syntetisk; Trevirke; Annen
fr: Matériau de l’instrument: Bois noir d'Afrique; Bois d'aulne; Aluminum; Bois de frêne; Tilleul; Bois de hêtre; Bois de hêtre; Laiton; Brésil; Bronze; Fibre de carbone; Céramique; Cocobolo; Cuivre; Bois d’ébène; Fibre de verre; Or; Plaqué or; Caoutchouc dur; Mahogany; Bois de pommier; Métal; Nickel; Argent nickel; Plaqué nickel; Nylon; bois de chêne; Pernambuco; Plastique; Rose bois; Caoutchouc; Silicone; Argent; Plaqué argent; Bois d’épicéa; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Synthétique; Bois; Autre
ru: Материал инструмента: Африканское черное дерево; Ольха; Алюминий; Ясень; Липа; Бук; Береза; Латунь; Бразильское дерево; Бронза; Углеродное волокно; Керамика; Кокоболо; Медь; Эбеновое дерево; Стекловолокно; Золото; Позолота; Твердая резина; Красное дерево; Клен; Металл; Никель; Нейзильбер; Никелированный; Нейлон; Дуб; Пернамбуку; Пластик; Палисандр; Резина; Силикон; Серебро; Серебрение; Ель; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Синтетика; Дерево; Другой
fi: Instrumentin materiaali: Afrikkalainen mustapuu; Leppä; Alumiini; Saarni; Lehmus; Pyökkipuu; Koivupuu; Messinki; Brasilpuu; Pronssi; Hiilikuitu; Keraaminen; Cocobolo; Kupari; Eebenpuu; Lasikuitu; Kulta; Kullattu; Kovakumi; Mahonki; Vaahterapuu; Metalli; Nikkeli; Nikkelihopea; Nikkelipinnoitettu; Nailon; Tammipuu; Pernambuco; Muovi; Ruusupuu; Kumi; Silikoni; Hopea; Hopeoitu; Kuusi; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Synteettinen; Puu; Muu
hr-HR: Materijal glazbala: Afričko crno drvo; Joha; Aluminij; Drvo jasena; Drvo lipe; Bukovina; Drvo breze; Mjed; Pernambuk; Bronca; Karbonska vlakna; Keramika; Kokobolo; Bakar; Ebanovina; Stakloplastika; Zlato; Pozlaćeno; Tvrda guma; Mahagonij; Javor; Metal; Nikal; Novo srebro; Niklano; Najlon; Hrastovina; Pernambuk; Plastika; Ružino drvo; Guma; Silikon; Srebro; Posrebreno; Smrekovina; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Sintetika; Drvo; Ostalo
en: Instrument material: African blackwood; Alder wood; Aluminum; Ash wood; Basswood; Beech wood; Birch wood; Brass; Brazilwood; Bronze; Carbon fiber; Ceramic; Cocobolo; Copper; Ebony wood; Fiberglass; Gold; Gold-plated; Hard rubber; Mahogany; Maple wood; Metal; Nickel; Nickel silver; Nickel-plated; Nylon; Oak wood; Pernambuco; Plastic; Rosewood; Rubber; Silicone; Silver; Silver-plated; Spruce wood; Stainless steel; Steel; Synthetic; Wood; Other
vi: Vật liệu nhạc cụ: Gỗ đen Châu Phi; Gỗ trăn; Nhôm; Gỗ tần bì; Gỗ Đoạn; Gỗ dẻ; Gỗ bạch dương; Đồng; Gỗ Brazilwood; Màu đồng; Sợi carbon; Gốm; Cocobolo; Màu đồng đỏ; Gỗ mun; Sợi thủy tinh; Vàng; Mạ vàng; Cao su cứng; Gỗ Dái ngựa; Gỗ phong; Kim loại; Niken; Bạc niken; Mạ niken; Nylon; Gỗ sồi; Pernambuco; Nhựa; Màu cẩm lai; Cao su; Silicon; Trắng; Mạ bạc; Gỗ vân sam; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Tổng hợp; Gỗ; Khác
it: Materiale dello strumento: Legno nero africano; Legno di ontano; Alluminio; Legno di frassino; Tiglio; Legno di faggio; Legno di betulla; Ottone; Legno brasiliano; Bronzo; Fibra di carbonio; Ceramica; Cocobolo; Rame; Legno di ebano; Vetroresina; Oro; Placcato oro; Gomma dura; Mogano; Legno di acero; Metallo; Nickel; Argento al nichel; Placcato nickel; Nylon; Legno di quercia; Pernambuco; Plastica; Palissandro; Gomma; Silicone; Argento; Placcato argento; Legno di abete rosso; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Sintetico; Legno; Altro
da: Instrumentmateriale: Afrikansk sorttræ; Alertræ; Aluminum; Asketræ; Basswood; Bøgetræ; Birketræ; Messing; Brazilwood; Bronze; Kulfiber; Keramik; Cocobolo; Kobber; Ibenholttræ; Glasfiber; Guld; Forgyldt; Hårdt gummi; Mahogni; Ahorntræ; Metal; Nikkel; Nikkel-sølv; Forniklet; Nylon; Egetræ; Pernambuco; Plast; Palisander; Gummi; Silikone; Sølv; Forsølvet; Grantræ; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Syntetisk; Træ; Andet
de: Instrumentenmaterial: Afrikanisches Grenadillholz; Erlenholz; Aluminium; Eschenholz; Linde; Buchenholz; Birkenholz; Messing; Brasilholz; Bronze; Kohlenstofffaser; Keramik; Cocobolo; Kupfer; Ebenholz; Fiberglas; Gold; Vergoldet; Hartgummi; Mahagoni; Ahornholz; Metall; Nickel; Nickelsilber; Vernickelt; Nylon; Eichenholz; Pernambuco; Kunststoff; Rosenholz; Gummi; Silikon; Silber; Versilbert; Fichtenholz; Edelstahl; Stahl; Synthetisch; Holz; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Material do instrumento: Madeira negra africana; Madeira de aliso; Alumínio; Madeira de freixo; Tília; Madeira de faia; Madeira de bétula; Latão; Pau-brasil; Bronze; Fibra de carbono; Cerâmica; Cocobolo; Cobre; Madeira de ébano; Fibra de vidro; Gold; Banhado a ouro; Borracha dura; Mogno; Madeira de bordo; Metal; Níquel; Prata níquel; Banhado a níquel; Nylon; Madeira de carvalho; Pernambuco; Plástico; Pau-rosa; Borracha; Silicone; Silver; Banhado a prata; Madeira de abeto; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Sintético; Madeira; Outro
sk-SK: Materiál nástroja: Africké čierne drevo; Jelšové drevo; Hliník; Jaseňové drevo; Lipové drevo; Bukové drevo; Brezové drevo; Mosadz; Sepan brazílsky; Bronzový; Uhlíkové vlákno; Keramika; Cocobolo; Meď; Ebenové drevo; Sklolaminát; Zlato; Pozlátený; Tvrdá guma; Mahagón; Javorové drevo; Kov; Nikel; Niklové striebro; Poniklovaný; Nylon; Dubové drevo; Pernambuco; Plast; Ruženín; Guma; Silikón; Strieborný; Postriebrený; Smrekové drevo; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ; Syntetický; Drevo; Iné